Missouri, session 2026, HB2709.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.073, 137.079, 137.115, and 164.121, RSMo, are repealed and
2 five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.067, 137.073, 137.079,
3 137.115, and 164.121, to read as follows:
137.067. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any ballot
2 measure seeking approval to add, change, or modify a tax on real property shall express
3 the effect of the proposed change within the ballot language in terms of the change in
4 real dollars owed per one hundred thousand dollars of a property's market valuation.
137.073. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
2 (1) "General reassessment", changes in value, entered in the assessor's books, of a
3 substantial portion of the parcels of real property within a county resulting wholly or partly
4 from reappraisal of value or other actions of the assessor or county equalization body or
5 ordered by the state tax commission or any court;
6 (2) "Tax rate", "rate", or "rate of levy", singular or plural, includes the tax rate for
7 each purpose of taxation of property a taxing authority is authorized to levy without a vote
8 and any tax rate authorized by election, including bond interest and sinking fund;
9 (3) "Tax rate ceiling", a tax rate as revised by the taxing authority to comply with the
10 provisions of this section or when a court has determined the tax rate; except that, other
11 provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, a school district may levy the operating
12 levy for school purposes required for the current year pursuant to subsection 2 of section
13 163.021, less all adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 2
14 Constitution, if such tax rate does not exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the
15 1980 tax year. This is the maximum tax rate that may be levied, unless a higher tax rate
16 ceiling is approved by voters of the political subdivision as provided in this section;
17 (4) "Tax revenue", when referring to the previous year, means the actual receipts from
18 ad valorem levies on all classes of property, including state-assessed property, in the
19 immediately preceding fiscal year of the political subdivision, plus an allowance for taxes
20 billed but not collected in the fiscal year and plus an additional allowance for the revenue
21 which would have been collected from property which was annexed by such political
22 subdivision but which was not previously used in determining tax revenue pursuant to this
23 section. The term "tax revenue" shall not include any receipts from ad valorem levies on any
24 property of a railroad corporation or a public utility, as these terms are defined in section
25 386.020, which were assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the previous year but are
26 assessed by the state tax commission in the current year. All school districts and those
27 counties levying sales taxes pursuant to chapter 67 shall include in the calculation of tax
28 revenue an amount equivalent to that by which they reduced property tax levies as a result of
29 sales tax pursuant to section 67.505 and section 164.013 [or as excess home dock city or
30 county fees as provided in subsection 4 of section 313.820] in the immediately preceding
31 fiscal year but not including any amount calculated to adjust for prior years. For purposes of
32 political subdivisions which were authorized to levy a tax in the prior year but which did not
33 levy such tax or levied a reduced rate, the term "tax revenue", as used in relation to the
34 revision of tax levies mandated by law, shall mean the revenues equal to the amount that
35 would have been available if the voluntary rate reduction had not been made.
36 2. Whenever changes in assessed valuation are entered in the assessor's books for any
37 personal property, in the aggregate, or for any subclass of real property as such subclasses are
38 established in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section
39 137.016, the county clerk in all counties and the assessor of St. Louis City shall notify each
40 political subdivision wholly or partially within the county or St. Louis City of the change in
41 valuation of each subclass of real property, individually, and personal property, in the
42 aggregate, exclusive of new construction and improvements. All political subdivisions shall
43 immediately revise the applicable rates of levy for each purpose for each subclass of real
44 property, individually, and personal property, in the aggregate, for which taxes are levied to
45 the extent necessary to produce from all taxable property, exclusive of new construction and
46 improvements, substantially the same amount of tax revenue as was produced in the previous
47 year for each subclass of real property, individually, and personal property, in the aggregate,
48 except that the rate shall not exceed the greater of the most recent voter-approved rate or the
49 most recent voter-approved rate as adjusted under subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this
50 section. Any political subdivision that has received approval from voters for a tax increase

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 3
51 after August 27, 2008, may levy a rate to collect substantially the same amount of tax revenue
52 as the amount of revenue that would have been derived by applying the voter-approved
53 increased tax rate ceiling to the total assessed valuation of the political subdivision as most
54 recently certified by the city or county clerk on or before the date of the election in which
55 such increase is approved, increased by the percentage increase in the consumer price index,
56 as provided by law, except that the [rate] rates of levy for each subclass of real property,
57 individually, and personal property, in the aggregate, shall not exceed the greater of the
58 most recent voter-approved rate or the most recent voter-approved rate as adjusted under
59 subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this section. Such tax revenue shall not include any receipts
60 from ad valorem levies on any real property which was assessed by the assessor of a county
61 or city in such previous year but is assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the current
62 year in a different subclass of real property. Where the taxing authority is a school district for
63 the purposes of revising the applicable rates of levy for each subclass of real property, the tax
64 revenues from state-assessed railroad and utility property shall be apportioned and attributed
65 to each subclass of real property based on the percentage of the total assessed valuation of the
66 county that each subclass of real property represents in the current [taxable] tax year. As
67 provided in Section 22 of Article X of the constitution, a political subdivision may also revise
68 each levy to allow for inflationary assessment growth occurring within the political
69 subdivision. The inflationary growth factor for any such subclass of real property or personal
70 property shall be limited to the actual assessment growth in such subclass or class, exclusive
71 of new construction and improvements, and exclusive of the assessed value on any real
72 property which was assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the current year in a
73 different subclass of real property, but not to exceed the consumer price index or five percent,
74 whichever is lower. [Should the tax revenue of a political subdivision from the various tax
75 rates determined in this subsection be different than the tax revenue that would have been
76 determined from a single tax rate as calculated pursuant to the method of calculation in this
77 subsection prior to January 1, 2003, then the political subdivision shall revise the tax rates of
78 those subclasses of real property, individually, and/or personal property, in the aggregate, in
79 which there is a tax rate reduction, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. Such
80 revision shall yield an amount equal to such difference and shall be apportioned among such
81 subclasses of real property, individually, and/or personal property, in the aggregate, based on
82 the relative assessed valuation of the class or subclasses of property experiencing a tax rate
83 reduction. Such revision in the tax rates of each class or subclass shall be made by computing
84 the percentage of current year adjusted assessed valuation of each class or subclass with a tax
85 rate reduction to the total current year adjusted assessed valuation of the class or subclasses
86 with a tax rate reduction, multiplying the resulting percentages by the revenue difference
87 between the single rate calculation and the calculations pursuant to this subsection and

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 4
88 dividing by the respective adjusted current year assessed valuation of each class or subclass to
89 determine the adjustment to the rate to be levied upon each class or subclass of property. The
90 adjustment computed herein shall be multiplied by one hundred, rounded to four decimals in
91 the manner provided in this subsection, and added to the initial rate computed for each class
92 or subclass of property. For school districts that levy separate tax rates on each subclass of
93 real property and personal property in the aggregate, if voters approved a ballot before
94 January 1, 2011, that presented separate stated tax rates to be applied to the different
95 subclasses of real property and personal property in the aggregate, or increases the separate
96 rates that may be levied on the different subclasses of real property and personal property in
97 the aggregate by different amounts, the tax rate that shall be used for the single tax rate
98 calculation shall be a blended rate, calculated in the manner provided under subdivision (1) of
99 subsection 6 of this section. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the contrary,
100 no revision to the rate of levy for personal property shall cause such levy to increase over the
101 levy for personal property from the prior year.]
102 3. (1) Where the taxing authority is a school district, it shall be required to revise the
103 rates of levy to the extent necessary to produce from all taxable property, including state-
104 assessed railroad and utility property, which shall be separately estimated in addition to other
105 data required in complying with section 164.011, substantially the amount of tax revenue
106 permitted in this section. In the year following tax rate reduction, the tax rate ceiling may be
107 adjusted to offset such district's reduction in the apportionment of state school moneys due to
108 its reduced tax rate. However, in the event any school district, in calculating a tax rate ceiling
109 pursuant to this section, requiring the estimating of effects of state-assessed railroad and
110 utility valuation or loss of state aid, discovers that the estimates used result in receipt of
111 excess revenues, which would have required a lower rate if the actual information had been
112 known, the school district shall reduce the tax rate ceiling in the following year to compensate
113 for the excess receipts, and the recalculated rate shall become the tax rate ceiling for purposes
114 of this section.
115 (2) For any political subdivision which experiences a reduction in the amount of
116 assessed valuation relating to a prior year, due to decisions of the state tax commission or a
117 court pursuant to sections 138.430 to 138.433, or due to clerical errors or corrections in the
118 calculation or recordation of any assessed valuation:
119 (a) Such political subdivision may revise the tax rate ceiling for each purpose it levies
120 taxes to compensate for the reduction in assessed value occurring after the political
121 subdivision calculated the tax rate ceiling for the particular subclass of real property or for
122 personal property, in the aggregate, in a prior year. Such revision by the political subdivision
123 shall be made at the time of the next calculation of the tax rate for the particular subclass of
124 real property or for personal property, in the aggregate, after the reduction in assessed

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 5
125 valuation has been determined and shall be calculated in a manner that results in the revised
126 tax rate ceiling being the same as it would have been had the corrected or finalized assessment
127 been available at the time of the prior calculation;
128 (b) In addition, for up to three years following the determination of the reduction in
129 assessed valuation as a result of circumstances defined in this subdivision, such political
130 subdivision may levy a tax rate for each purpose it levies taxes above the revised tax rate
131 ceiling provided in paragraph (a) of this subdivision to recoup any revenues it was entitled to
132 receive had the corrected or finalized assessment been available at the time of the prior
133 calculation.
134 4. (1) In order to implement the provisions of this section and Section 22 of Article X
135 of the Constitution of Missouri, the term improvements shall apply to [both] real [and
136 personal] property. In order to determine the value of new construction and improvements,
137 each county assessor shall maintain a record of real property valuations in such a manner as to
138 identify each year the increase in valuation for each political subdivision in the county as a
139 result of new construction and improvements. The value of new construction and
140 improvements shall include the additional assessed value of all improvements or additions to
141 real property which were begun after and were not part of the prior year's assessment, except
142 that the additional assessed value of all improvements or additions to real property which had
143 been totally or partially exempt from ad valorem taxes pursuant to sections 99.800 to 99.865,
144 sections 135.200 to 135.255, and section 353.110 shall be included in the value of new
145 construction and improvements when the property becomes totally or partially subject to
146 assessment and payment of all ad valorem taxes. [The aggregate increase in valuation of
147 personal property for the current year over that of the previous year is the equivalent of the
148 new construction and improvements factor for personal property. Notwithstanding any opt-
149 out implemented pursuant to subsection 14 of section 137.115,] The assessor shall certify the
150 amount of new construction and improvements and the amount of assessed value on any real
151 property which was assessed by the assessor of a county or city in such previous year but is
152 assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the current year in a different subclass of real
153 property separately for each of the three subclasses of real property for each political
154 subdivision to the county clerk in order that political subdivisions shall have this information
155 for the purpose of calculating tax rates pursuant to this section and Section 22, Article X,
156 Constitution of Missouri. In addition, the state tax commission shall certify each year to each
157 county clerk the increase in the general price level as measured by the Consumer Price Index
158 for All Urban Consumers for the United States, or its successor publications, as defined and
159 officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, or its successor agency. The
160 state tax commission shall certify the increase in such index on the latest twelve-month basis
161 available on February first of each year over the immediately preceding prior twelve-month

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 6
162 period in order that political subdivisions shall have this information available in setting their
163 tax rates according to law and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri. For
164 purposes of implementing the provisions of this section and Section 22 of Article X of the
165 Missouri Constitution, the term "property" means all taxable property, including state-
166 assessed property.
167 (2) Each political subdivision required to revise rates of levy pursuant to this section
168 or Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri shall calculate each tax rate it is
169 authorized to levy and, in establishing each tax rate, shall consider each provision for tax rate
170 revision provided in this section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri,
171 separately and without regard to annual tax rate reductions provided in section 67.505 and
172 section 164.013. Each political subdivision shall set each tax rate it is authorized to levy
173 using the calculation that produces the lowest tax rate ceiling. It is further the intent of the
174 general assembly, pursuant to the authority of Section 10(c) of Article X of the Constitution
175 of Missouri, that the provisions of such section be applicable to tax rate revisions mandated
176 pursuant to Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri as to reestablishing tax
177 rates as revised in subsequent years, enforcement provisions, and other provisions not in
178 conflict with Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri. Annual tax rate
179 reductions provided in section 67.505 and section 164.013 shall be applied to the tax rate as
180 established pursuant to this section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
181 Missouri, unless otherwise provided by law.
182 5. (1) In all political subdivisions, the tax rate ceiling established pursuant to this
183 section shall not be increased unless approved by a vote of the people. Approval of the higher
184 tax rate shall be by at least a majority of votes cast. When a proposed higher tax rate requires
185 approval by more than a simple majority pursuant to any provision of law or the constitution,
186 the tax rate increase must receive approval by at least the majority required.
187 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all tax levy increases
188 applied to any real and personal property shall be applied to each subclass of property
189 equally.
190 (2) When voters approve an increase in the tax rate, the amount of the increase shall
191 be added to the tax rate ceiling as calculated pursuant to this section to the extent the total rate
192 does not exceed any maximum rate prescribed by law. If a ballot question presents a stated
193 tax rate for approval rather than describing the amount of increase in the question, the stated
194 tax rate approved shall be adjusted as provided in this section and, so adjusted, shall be the
195 current tax rate ceiling. The increased tax rate ceiling as approved shall be adjusted such that
196 when applied to the current total assessed valuation of the political subdivision, excluding
197 new construction and improvements since the date of the election approving such increase,
198 the revenue derived from the adjusted tax rate ceiling is equal to the sum of: the amount of

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 7
199 revenue which would have been derived by applying the voter-approved increased tax rate
200 ceiling to total assessed valuation of the political subdivision, as most recently certified by the
201 city or county clerk on or before the date of the election in which such increase is approved,
202 increased by the percentage increase in the consumer price index, as provided by law. Such
203 adjusted tax rate ceiling may be applied to the total assessed valuation of the political
204 subdivision at the setting of the next tax rate. If a ballot question presents a phased-in tax rate
205 increase, upon voter approval, each tax rate increase shall be adjusted in the manner
206 prescribed in this section to yield the sum of: the amount of revenue that would be derived by
207 applying such voter-approved increased rate to the total assessed valuation, as most recently
208 certified by the city or county clerk on or before the date of the election in which such
209 increase was approved, increased by the percentage increase in the consumer price index, as
210 provided by law, from the date of the election to the time of such increase and, so adjusted,
211 shall be the current tax rate ceiling.
212 (3) The provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection notwithstanding, if prior
213 to the expiration of a temporary levy increase, voters approve a subsequent levy
214 increase, the new tax rate ceiling shall remain in effect only until such time as the
215 temporary levy expires under the terms originally approved by a vote of the people, at
216 which time the tax rate ceiling shall be decreased by the amount of the temporary levy
217 increase. If, prior to the expiration of a temporary levy increase, voters of a political
218 subdivision are asked to approve an additional, permanent increase to the political
219 subdivision's tax rate ceiling, voters shall be submitted ballot language that clearly
220 indicates that if the permanent levy increase is approved, the temporary levy shall be
221 made permanent.
222 (4) The governing body of any political subdivision may levy a tax rate lower than its
223 tax rate ceiling [and]. Such reduction to the tax rate ceiling in a nonreassessment year
224 shall be applied in the immediately following year of general reassessment. The
225 governing body of any political subdivision may, in a nonreassessment year, increase that
226 previously lowered tax rate to a level not exceeding the tax rate ceiling without voter
227 approval in the manner provided under subdivision [(4)] (5) of this subsection. Such
228 increase to the tax rate ceiling in a nonreassessment year shall be applied in the
229 immediately following year of general reassessment. Nothing in this section shall be
230 construed as prohibiting a political subdivision from voluntarily levying a tax rate lower than
231 that which is required under the provisions of this section or from seeking voter approval of a
232 reduction to such political subdivision's tax rate ceiling.
233 [(4)] (5) In a year of general reassessment, a governing body whose tax rate is lower
234 than its tax rate ceiling shall revise its tax rate pursuant to the provisions of subsection 4 of
235 this section as if its tax rate was at the tax rate ceiling. In a year following general

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 8
236 reassessment, if such governing body intends to increase its tax rate, the governing body shall
237 conduct a public hearing, and in a public meeting it shall adopt an ordinance, resolution, or
238 policy statement justifying its action prior to setting and certifying its tax rate. The provisions
239 of this subdivision shall not apply to any political subdivision which levies a tax rate lower
240 than its tax rate ceiling solely due to a reduction required by law resulting from sales tax
241 collections. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any political subdivision
242 which has received voter approval for an increase to its tax rate ceiling subsequent to setting
243 its most recent tax rate.
244 (6) (a) As used in this subdivision, the following terms mean:
245 a. "Current tax rate ceiling", the tax rate ceiling in effect before the voters
246 approve a higher tax rate;
247 b. "Increased tax rate ceiling", the new tax rate ceiling in effect after the voters
248 approve a higher tax rate.
249 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when the
250 required majority of voters in a political subdivision passes an increase in the political
251 subdivision's tax rate, the political subdivision shall use the current tax rate ceiling and
252 the increase approved by the voters in establishing the rates of levy for the tax year
253 immediately following the election.
254 (c) If the assessed valuation of real property in such political subdivision is
255 reduced in such tax year immediately following the election, such political subdivision
256 may raise its rates of levy so that the revenue received from its local real property tax
257 rates equals the amount the political subdivision would have received from the increased
258 rates of levy had there been no reduction in the assessed valuation of real property in the
259 political subdivision.
260 (d) Using the increased tax rate ceiling shall be revenue neutral as required in
261 Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of Missouri.
262 6. (1) For the purposes of calculating state aid for public schools pursuant to section
263 163.031, each taxing authority which is a school district shall determine its proposed tax rate
264 as a blended rate of the classes or subclasses of property. Such blended rate shall be
265 calculated by first determining the total tax revenue of the property within the jurisdiction of
266 the taxing authority, which amount shall be equal to the sum of the products of multiplying
267 the assessed valuation of each class and subclass of property by the corresponding tax rate for
268 such class or subclass, then dividing the total tax revenue by the total assessed valuation of
269 the same jurisdiction, and then multiplying the resulting quotient by a factor of one hundred.
270 Where the taxing authority is a school district, such blended rate shall also be used by such
271 school district for calculating revenue from state-assessed railroad and utility property as
272 defined in chapter 151 and for apportioning the tax rate by purpose.

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 9
273 (2) Each taxing authority proposing to levy a tax rate in any year shall notify the clerk
274 of the county commission in the county or counties where the tax rate applies of its tax rate
275 ceiling and its proposed tax rate. Each taxing authority shall express its proposed tax rate in a
276 fraction equal to the nearest one-tenth of a cent, unless its proposed tax rate is in excess of one
277 dollar, then one/one-hundredth of a cent. If a taxing authority shall round to one/one-
278 hundredth of a cent, it shall round up a fraction greater than or equal to five/one-thousandth of
279 one cent to the next higher one/one-hundredth of a cent; if a taxing authority shall round to
280 one-tenth of a cent, it shall round up a fraction greater than or equal to five/one-hundredths of
281 a cent to the next higher one-tenth of a cent. Any taxing authority levying a property tax rate
282 shall provide data, in such form as shall be prescribed by the state auditor by rule,
283 substantiating such tax rate complies with Missouri law. All forms for the calculation of rates
284 pursuant to this section shall be promulgated as a rule and shall not be incorporated by
285 reference. The state auditor shall promulgate rules for any and all forms for the calculation of
286 rates pursuant to this section which do not currently exist in rule form or that have been
287 incorporated by reference. In addition, each taxing authority proposing to levy a tax rate for
288 debt service shall provide data, in such form as shall be prescribed by the state auditor by rule,
289 substantiating the tax rate for debt service complies with Missouri law. A tax rate proposed
290 for annual debt service requirements will be prima facie valid if, after making the payment for
291 which the tax was levied, bonds remain outstanding and the debt fund reserves do not exceed
292 the following year's payments. The county clerk shall keep on file and available for public
293 inspection all such information for a period of three years. The clerk shall, within three days
294 of receipt, forward a copy of the notice of a taxing authority's tax rate ceiling and proposed
295 tax rate and any substantiating data to the state auditor. The state auditor shall, within fifteen
296 days of the date of receipt, examine such information and return to the county clerk his or her
297 findings as to compliance of the tax rate ceiling with this section and as to compliance of any
298 proposed tax rate for debt service with Missouri law. If the state auditor believes that a taxing
299 authority's proposed tax rate does not comply with Missouri law, then the state auditor's
300 findings shall include a recalculated tax rate, and the state auditor may request a taxing
301 authority to submit documentation supporting such taxing authority's proposed tax rate. The
302 county clerk shall immediately forward a copy of the auditor's findings to the taxing authority
303 and shall file a copy of the findings with the information received from the taxing authority.
304 The taxing authority shall have fifteen days from the date of receipt from the county clerk of
305 the state auditor's findings and any request for supporting documentation to accept or reject in
306 writing the rate change certified by the state auditor and to submit all requested information to
307 the state auditor. A copy of the taxing authority's acceptance or rejection and any information
308 submitted to the state auditor shall also be mailed to the county clerk. If a taxing authority
309 rejects a rate change certified by the state auditor and the state auditor does not receive

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 10
310 supporting information which justifies the taxing authority's original or any subsequent
311 proposed tax rate, then the state auditor shall refer the perceived violations of such taxing
312 authority to the attorney general's office and the attorney general is authorized to obtain
313 injunctive relief to prevent the taxing authority from levying a violative tax rate.
314 (3) In the event that the taxing authority incorrectly completes the forms created and
315 promulgated under subdivision (2) of this subsection, or makes a clerical error, the taxing
316 authority may submit amended forms with an explanation for the needed changes. If such
317 amended forms are filed under regulations prescribed by the state auditor, the state auditor
318 shall take into consideration such amended forms for the purposes of this subsection.
319 7. No tax rate shall be extended on the tax rolls by the county clerk unless the political
320 subdivision has complied with the foregoing provisions of this section.
321 8. Whenever a taxpayer has cause to believe that a taxing authority has not complied
322 with the provisions of this section, the taxpayer may make a formal complaint with the
323 prosecuting attorney of the county. Where the prosecuting attorney fails to bring an action
324 within ten days of the filing of the complaint, the taxpayer may bring a civil action pursuant to
325 this section and institute an action as representative of a class of all taxpayers within a taxing
326 authority if the class is so numerous that joinder of all members is impracticable, if there are
327 questions of law or fact common to the class, if the claims or defenses of the representative
328 parties are typical of the claims or defenses of the class, and if the representative parties will
329 fairly and adequately protect the interests of the class. In any class action maintained
330 pursuant to this section, the court may direct to the members of the class a notice to be
331 published at least once each week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
332 circulation published in the county where the civil action is commenced and in other counties
333 within the jurisdiction of a taxing authority. The notice shall advise each member that the
334 court will exclude him or her from the class if he or she so requests by a specified date, that
335 the judgment, whether favorable or not, will include all members who do not request
336 exclusion, and that any member who does not request exclusion may, if he or she desires,
337 enter an appearance. In any class action brought pursuant to this section, the court, in
338 addition to the relief requested, shall assess against the taxing authority found to be in
339 violation of this section the reasonable costs of bringing the action, including reasonable
340 attorney's fees, provided no attorney's fees shall be awarded any attorney or association of
341 attorneys who receive public funds from any source for their services. Any action brought
342 pursuant to this section shall be set for hearing as soon as practicable after the cause is at
343 issue.
344 9. If in any action, including a class action, the court issues an order requiring a taxing
345 authority to revise the tax rates as provided in this section or enjoins a taxing authority from
346 the collection of a tax because of its failure to revise the rate of levy as provided in this

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 11
347 section, any taxpayer paying his or her taxes when an improper rate is applied has erroneously
348 paid his or her taxes in part, whether or not the taxes are paid under protest as provided in
349 section 139.031 or otherwise contested. The part of the taxes paid erroneously is the
350 difference in the amount produced by the original levy and the amount produced by the
351 revised levy. The township or county collector of taxes or the collector of taxes in any city
352 shall refund the amount of the tax erroneously paid. The taxing authority refusing to revise
353 the rate of levy as provided in this section shall make available to the collector all funds
354 necessary to make refunds pursuant to this subsection. No taxpayer shall receive any interest
355 on any money erroneously paid by him or her pursuant to this subsection. Effective in the
356 1994 tax year, nothing in this section shall be construed to require a taxing authority to refund
357 any tax erroneously paid prior to or during the third tax year preceding the current tax year.
358 10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
359 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
360 with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
361 This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
362 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
363 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
364 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2004, shall be invalid
365 and void.
137.079. Prior to setting its [rate or] rates as required by section 137.073, each taxing
2 authority shall exclude from its total assessed valuation seventy-two percent of the total
3 amount of assessed value of business personal property that is the subject of an appeal at the
4 state tax commission or in a court of competent jurisdiction in this state. This exclusion shall
5 only apply to the portion of the assessed value of business personal property that is disputed
6 in the appeal, and shall not exclude any portion of the same property that is not disputed. [If
7 the taxing authority uses a multirate approach] For the purpose of setting rates as provided
8 in section 137.073, this exclusion shall be made from the personal property class. The state
9 tax commission shall provide each taxing authority with the total assessed value of business
10 personal property within the jurisdiction of such taxing authority for which an appeal is
11 pending no later than August twentieth of each year. Whenever any appeal is resolved,
12 whether by final adjudication or settlement, and the result of the appeal causes money to be
13 paid to the taxing authority, the taxing authority shall not be required to make an additional
14 adjustment to its rate or rates due to such payment once the deadline for setting its rates, as
15 provided by this chapter, has passed in a taxable year, but shall adjust its rate or rates due to
16 such payment in the next rate setting cycle to offset the payment in the next taxable year. For
17 the purposes of this section, the term "business personal property" means tangible personal
18 property which is used in a trade or business or used for production of income and which has

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 12
19 a determinable life of longer than one year except that supplies used by a business shall also
20 be considered business personal property, but shall not include livestock, farm machinery,
21 property subject to the motor vehicle registration provisions of chapter 301, property subject
22 to the tables provided in section 137.078, the property of rural electric cooperatives under
23 chapter 394, or property assessed by the state tax commission under chapters 151, 153, and
24 155, section 137.022, and sections 137.1000 to 137.1030.
137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the assessor or the
2 assessor's deputies in all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis shall annually
3 make a list of all real and tangible personal property taxable in the assessor's city, county,
4 town or district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section and section
5 137.078, the assessor shall annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and one-third
6 percent of its true value in money as of January first of each calendar year. The assessor shall
7 annually assess all real property, including any new construction and improvements to real
8 property, and possessory interests in real property at the percent of its true value in money set
9 in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of any possessory interest in real
10 property in subclass (3), where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate airport
11 boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a
12 commercial airport having a FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political subdivision,
13 shall be the otherwise applicable true value in money of any such possessory interest in real
14 property, less the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than the political
15 subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on such real property completed
16 after January 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned possessory interest,
17 regardless of the year in which such costs were incurred or whether such costs were
18 considered in any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real property in the
19 following manner: new assessed values shall be determined as of January first of each odd-
20 numbered year and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same assessed values shall
21 apply in the following even-numbered year, except for new construction and property
22 improvements which shall be valued as though they had been completed as of January first of
23 the preceding odd-numbered year. The assessor may call at the office, place of doing
24 business, or residence of each person required by this chapter to list property, and require the
25 person to make a correct statement of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
26 person or under his or her care, charge or management, taxable in the county. On or before
27 January first of each even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a two-year
28 assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and the state tax commission for
29 their respective approval or modification. The county governing body shall approve and
30 forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by February first.
31 If the county governing body fails to forward the plan or its alternative to the plan to the state

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 13
32 tax commission by February first, the assessor's plan shall be considered approved by the
33 county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to approve a plan and if the state tax
34 commission and the assessor and the governing body of the county involved are unable to
35 resolve the differences, in order to receive state cost-share funds outlined in section 137.750,
36 the county or the assessor shall petition the administrative hearing commission, by May first,
37 to decide all matters in dispute regarding the assessment maintenance plan. Upon agreement
38 of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties proceed with mediation or
39 arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final decision of the administrative
40 hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in the circuit court of the county
41 involved. In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real property within any county with a
42 charter form of government, or within a city not within a county, is made by a computer,
43 computer-assisted method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported by clear,
44 convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the assessor at any
45 hearing or appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
46 presumption that the assessment was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a
47 computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
48 (1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal of the property by generally
49 accepted appraisal techniques; and
50 (2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three comparable properties and the
51 address or location thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means that:
52 (a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the property valuation; and
53 (b) Such properties are not more than one mile from the site of the disputed property,
54 except where no similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed property, the nearest
55 comparable property shall be used. Such property shall be within five hundred square feet in
56 size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in age, floor plan, number of
57 rooms, and other relevant characteristics.
58 2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City of St. Louis may send personal
59 property assessment forms through the mail.
60 3. The following items of personal property shall each constitute separate subclasses
61 of tangible personal property and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of taxation at
62 the following percentages of their true value in money:
63 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an unmanufactured condition, one-half of
64 one percent;
65 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
66 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
67 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration as and are registered as historic
68 motor vehicles pursuant to section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five years

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 14
69 old and which are used solely for noncommercial purposes and are operated less than two
70 hundred hours per year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five percent;
71 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
72 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and tools and equipment used in
73 retooling for the purpose of introducing new product lines or used for making improvements
74 to existing products by any company which is located in a state enterprise zone and which is
75 identified by any standard industrial classification number cited in subdivision (7) of section
76 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
77 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and related solar equipment, components,
78 materials, and supplies installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy systems, as
79 described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of section 144.030, that were constructed and
80 producing solar energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
81 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true and correct statement of the
82 property, in a printed blank prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being filled out,
83 shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to as provided in section 137.155. The list shall
84 then be delivered to the assessor.
85 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such subclasses are established in Section 4
86 (b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016, shall be assessed
87 at the following percentages of true value:
88 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen percent;
89 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent; and
90 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two percent.
91 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or, if not located within a county,
92 then the assessor of such city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real property if the use
93 or purpose of such real property is changed after such property is assessed under the
94 provisions of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such property shall be reclassified,
95 he or she shall determine the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage of the
96 tax year that such property was classified in each subclassification.
97 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010, which are actually used as
98 dwelling units shall be assessed at the same percentage of true value as residential real
99 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of assessment of true value for such
100 manufactured homes shall be the same as for residential real property. If the county collector
101 cannot identify or find the manufactured home when attempting to attach the manufactured
102 home for payment of taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county collector may
103 request the county commission to have the manufactured home removed from the tax books,
104 and such request shall be granted within thirty days after the request is made; however, the
105 removal from the tax books does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it is

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 15
106 later identified or found. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home located in a
107 manufactured home rental park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
108 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal property. For purposes of this
109 section, a manufactured home located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
110 may be considered real property.
111 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered a parcel for the purpose of
112 reimbursement pursuant to section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to be
113 real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015 and assessed as a realty improvement
114 to the existing real estate parcel.
115 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the assessment of a manufactured
116 home shall be included on the personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
117 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of
118 section 442.015, in which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment of the
119 manufactured home as a realty improvement to the existing real estate parcel shall be
120 included on the real property tax statement of the real estate owner.
121 9. The assessor of each county and each city not within a county shall use a nationally
122 recognized automotive trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
123 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book, Edmunds, or other similar
124 publication as the recommended guide of information for determining the true value of motor
125 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax commission shall select and make
126 available to all assessors which publication shall be used. The assessor of each county and
127 each city not within a county shall use the trade-in value published in the current October
128 issue of the publication selected by the state tax commission. The assessor shall not use a
129 value that is greater than the average trade-in value in determining the true value of the motor
130 vehicle without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years
131 old or newer from a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other than average
132 without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for
133 a particular motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use such information or
134 publications that, in the assessor's judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
135 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of less than fifty thousand dollars as
136 of January 1, 2025, the assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount greater
137 than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous year, provided that such motor vehicle
138 was properly assessed in the previous year.
139 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed valuation of any parcel of subclass
140 (1) real property by more than fifteen percent since the last assessment, excluding increases
141 due to new construction or improvements, the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of
142 such property.

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 16
143 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to subsection 10 of this section, the
144 assessor shall notify the property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the owner
145 clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
146 inspection is required, the property owner may request that an interior inspection be
147 performed during the physical inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days to
148 notify the assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
149 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection 10 of this section, shall include,
150 but not be limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of all exterior portions of the
151 land and any buildings and improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably and
152 lawfully gain external access, and shall include an observation and review of the interior of
153 any buildings or improvements on the property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant
154 to subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or
155 the like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as required by
156 this section.
157 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards as proper form of payment of
158 outstanding property tax or license due. No county or city collector may charge surcharge for
159 payment by credit card which exceeds the fee or surcharge charged by the credit card bank,
160 processor, or issuer for its service. A county or city collector may accept payment by
161 electronic transfers of funds in payment of any tax or license and charge the person making
162 such payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the bank, processor, or issuer of
163 such electronic payment.
164 14. [Any county or city not within a county in this state may, by an affirmative vote of
165 the governing body of such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and sections
166 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
167 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house committee
168 substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-
169 second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of the general
170 reassessment, prior to January first of any year. No county or city not within a county
171 shall exercise this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of this section and
172 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first
173 general assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
174 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no.
175 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a year of general
176 reassessment. For the purposes of applying the provisions of this subsection, a political
177 subdivision contained within two or more counties where at least one of such counties has
178 opted out and at least one of such counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate as
179 in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly,

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 17
180 second regular session. A governing body of a city not within a county or a county that has
181 opted out under the provisions of this subsection may choose to implement the provisions of
182 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of
183 the ninety-first general assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as modified by
184 house committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill
185 no. 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of general
186 reassessment, by an affirmative vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
187 any year.
188 15. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than twenty-
189 six thousand three hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred inhabitants
190 located in any county that has exercised its authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this
191 section may levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal property only if such
192 city bills and collects its own property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing and
193 collection of such separate and differing tax rates. Such separate and differing rates shall not
194 exceed such city's tax rate ceiling.
195 16.] Any portion of real property that is available as reserve for strip, surface, or coal
196 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that has not
197 been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be assessed based upon how the real
198 property is currently being used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state tax
199 commission, state agency, or political subdivision responsible for the administration of tax
200 policies shall, in the performance of its duties, make available all books, records, and
201 information requested, except such books, records, and information as are by law declared
202 confidential in nature, including individually identifiable information regarding a specific
203 taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property. For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall
204 mean all real property that is in use or readily available as a reserve for strip, surface, or coal
205 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to others that
206 has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
164.121. 1. The school board of any district other than a metropolitan or urban
2 district may borrow money and issue bonds for the payment thereof for the following
3 purposes:
4 (1) Purchasing schoolhouse sites and other land for school purposes;
5 (2) Erecting schoolhouses or library buildings;
6 (3) Furnishing schoolhouses or library buildings;
7 (4) Building additions to or repairing old buildings;
8 (5) Purchasing school buses and other transportation equipment;
9 (6) Paying off and discharging assessments made by counties, cities, towns and
10 villages or other political subdivisions or public corporations of the state against the district in

HCS HBs 2709 & 2671 18
11 connection with the erection, construction and maintenance of sewers and sewer systems,
12 sidewalks, guttering, curbing and paving of streets and alleys adjoining and abutting real
13 estate of the district if the general funds of the district are insufficient in the judgment of the
14 board to pay and discharge the assessment.
15 2. The question of any loan under this section shall be decided at an election.
16 3. Notice of the submission of the question shall include the amount of the loan
17 required and for what purpose.
✔